fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-D-nîtim_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - nîtim / -îtimw- - ok : # -m animate dependent cross-cousin	AEW NDA3
     nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nîtim
     nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kîtim
     nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg: nîtimonân
     nîtim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Sg: kîtimonaw
     nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kîtimowâw

     nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Obv: nîtimwa
     nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Obv: kîtimwa
     nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Obv: nîtimonâna
     nîtim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Obv: kîtimonawa
     nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Obv: kîtimowâwa

     nîtim+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv: wîtimwa
     nîtim+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv: wîtimowâwa
     nîtim+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: wîtimoyiwa


     nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl: nîtimwak
     nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kîtimwak
     nîtim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl: nîtimonânak
     nîtim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Pl: kîtimonawak
     nîtim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kîtimowâwak


     nîtim+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nîcimos,     nîcimosis]
     nîtim+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kîcimos,     kîcimosis]
     nîtim+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nîcimosinân, nîcimosisinân]
     nîtim+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kîcimosinaw, kîcimosisinaw]
     nîtim+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kîcimosiwâw, kîcimosisiwâw]

     nîtim+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv:    [wîcimosa,     wîcimosisa]
     nîtim+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv:    [wîcimosiwâwa, wîcimosisiwâwa]
     nîtim+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: [wîcimosiyiwa, wîcimosisiyiwa]

     nîtim+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl:    [nîcimosak,     nîcimosisak]
     nîtim+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kîcimosak,     kîcimosisak]
     nîtim+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl:    [nîcimosinânak, nîcimosisinânak]
     nîtim+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kîcimosinawak, kîcimosisinawak]
     nîtim+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kîcimosiwâwak, kîcimosisiwâwak]
